Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Liquor Control
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative expenses ........... $ 96,518,875
(2) Marijuana regulation
- recreational ............................ $ 23,477,207
(3) Marijuana regulation
- medical ................................... $ 6,085,931
(4) Agents’ compensation
- all other .................................. $159,118,952
(5) Agents’ compensation
- distillery agents ...................... $ 7,767,000
(6) Capital improvements ............... $ 237,745
SECTION 2. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by  the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission for liquor purchases are not limited.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5018 (HB 5018-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5018 (HB 5018-A) Page 2